dev/spellrelax.twol
Alphabet

 !A Á Â Ǎ B Ç D E É Ê Ě Ɛ Ɛ́ Ɛ̂ Ɛ̌ Ä F G H I Í Î Ǐ J Ž K L M N Ň O Ó Ô Ǒ Ö Ɔ Ɔ́ Ɔ̂ Ɔ̌ P Q R S Ş T U Ú Û Ǔ Ü W X Y Ý Z
 !a á â ǎ b ç d e é ê ě ɛ ɛ́ ɛ̂ ɛ̌ ä f g h i í î ǐ j ž k l m n ň o ó ô ǒ ö ɔ ɔ́ ɔ̂ ɔ̌ p q r s ş t u ú û ǔ ü w x y ý z
 A Á Â Ǎ B Ç D E É Ê Ě Ɛ Ɛ́ Ɛ̂ Ɛ̌ Ä F G H I Í Î Ǐ J Ž K L M N Ň O Ó Ô Ǒ Ö Ɔ Ɔ́ Ɔ̂ Ɔ̌ P Q R S Ş T U Ú Û Ǔ Ü W X Y Ý Z
 a á b ç d e é é ɛ f g h i í j k l m n o ǒ ó ɔ p q r s t u ú w x y z ́


! a:a á:a á:á 
! â:a â:â
! ǎ:a ǎ:ǎ
 a:ǎ a:â

! e:e é:e é:é
! ê:e ê:ê
! ě:e ě:ě
 e:ê e:ě

! é:é
! 0:́
! í:i
! ɛ:e

! i:i í:i í:í
! î:i î:î
! ǐ:i ǐ:ǐ
 i:î

! o:o ó:o ó:ó
! ô:o ô:ô
! ǒ:o ǒ:ǒ
 o:ǒ o:ô

! u:u ú:u ú:ú
! û:u û:û
! ǔ:u ǔ:ǔ
 u:û

! e:ɛ E:Ɛ
! é:ɛ́ É:Ɛ́
! ê:ɛ̂ Ê:Ɛ̂
! ě:ɛ̌ Ě:Ɛ̌

! o:ɔ O:Ɔ
! ó:ɔ́ Ó:Ɔ́
! ô:ɔ̂ Ô:Ɔ̂
! ǒ:ɔ̌ Ǒ:Ɔ̌

 á:a í:i é:e ó:o ú:u
! a:a i:i e:e o:o u:u
! á:á í:í é:é ó:ó ú:ú
! é:é


 ɛ:e ɔ:o
! ɛ:é ɔ:ó  ! FIXME: this should be more specific, see rule below

 ́:́
 ́:0
 0:́

 ̌:̌
 ̌:0
! 0:̌

 ̂:̂
 ̂:0

! O:O 
;

Rules

"Spell relax"
a => _ ;

!"Treat characters with combining acute as combined characters"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ ́: ;
!      where Vx in ( á é í ó ú )
!            Vy in ( a e i o u )
!      matched ;

!"No combining accute"
!́:0 <=> _ ;


!  kolóta for kolɔ́ta
!@ k o l ɔ:ó ́:0 t a
"Treat ó and é as ɔ and ɛ (before combining acute)"
Vx:Vy => _ ́:0 ;
      where Vx in ( ɛ ɔ )
            Vy in ( é ó )
      matched ;
!X k o l ó:ɔ 0:́ t a
! FIXME: this should replace the more general statement above
!"Treat ó and é as ɔ and ɛ (before combining acute)"
!Vx:Vy => _ 0:́ ;
!      where Vx in ( é ó )
!            Vy in ( ɛ ɔ )
!      matched ;

!"Allow addition of combining acute after ɛ ɔ"
!́:0 <=> Vx:Vy _ ;
!    where Vx in ( ɛ ɔ )
!          Vy in ( é ó )
!    matched ;

! kolota for kolɔ́ta
!@ k o l ɔ:o ́:0 t a
!@ k o l ɔ:o ́:́ t a
!"Treat o and e as ɔ́ and ɛ́"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ ́:0 ;
!      where Vx in ( ɛ ɔ )
!            Vy in ( e o )
!      matched ;
!X k o l o:ɔ 0:́ t a
!"Treat o and e as ɔ́ and ɛ́"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ 0:́ ;
!      where Vx in ( e o )
!            Vy in ( ɛ ɔ )
!      matched ;
